Illinois, session 104th, HB2683.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. References to Act. This Act may be referred to 5as the Equality for Every Family Act. 6    Section 5. The Illinois Parentage Act of 2015 is amended 7by changing Sections 102, 103, 105, 107, 201, 204, 205, 206, 8301, 302, 303, 305, 401, 402, 403, 404, 405, 407, 408, 501, 9502, 601, 602, 603, 604, 605, 606, 608, 609, 610, 612, 614, 10615, 617, 621, 622, 702, 703, 704, 705, 707, 708, 709, and 710 11and by adding Section 704.5 as follows: 12    (750 ILCS 46/102)13    Sec. 102. Public policy. Illinois recognizes the right of 14every child to the physical, mental, emotional, and financial 15support of a parent or his or her parents. The parent-child 16relationship, including support obligations, extends equally 17to every child and to his or her parent or to each of his or 18her 2 parents, regardless of the legal relationship of the 19parents, and regardless of whether a parent is a minor. A child 20shall have the same rights and protections under law to 21parentage without regard to the marital status, age, gender, 22gender identity or sexual orientation of their parents or the   HB2683- 2 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1circumstances of the child's birth, including whether the 2child was born as a result of assisted reproduction or 3surrogacy. 4(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 5    (750 ILCS 46/103)6    Sec. 103. Definitions. In this Act:7    (a) "Acknowledged parent father" means a person man who 8has established a parent-child father-child relationship under 9Article 3. 10    (b) "Adjudicated parent father" means a person man who has 11been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction, or as 12authorized under Article X of the Illinois Public Aid Code, to 13be the parent father of a child. 14    (c) "Alleged genetic parent father" means a person man who 15alleges himself to be, or is alleged to be, a genetic parent 16the biological father or a possible biological father of a 17child, but whose parentage paternity has not been adjudicated 18established. The term does not include: 19        (1) a presumed parent or acknowledged parent father; 20    or21        (2) a person man whose parental rights have been 22    terminated or declared not to exist; or23        (3) a donor. 24    (d) "Assisted reproduction" means a method of achieving a 25pregnancy through means other than by sexual intercourse,   HB2683- 3 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1including, but not limited to, all of the following: (1) 2artificial insemination or intrauterine, intracervical, or 3vaginal insemination; (2) donation of gametes; (3) donation of 4embryos; (4) in vitro fertilization and embryo transfer; (5) 5intracytoplasmic sperm injection; or (6) assisted reproductive 6technology an artificial insemination or an embryo transfer 7and includes gamete and embryo donation. "Assisted 8reproduction" does not include any pregnancy achieved through 9sexual intercourse.10    (e) "Child" means an individual of any age whose parentage 11may be established under this Act. 12    (f) "Combined parentage paternity index" means the 13likelihood of parentage paternity calculated by computing the 14ratio between: 15        (1) the likelihood that the tested person man is the 16    parent father, based on the genetic markers of the tested 17    person, parent who gave birth man, mother, and child, 18    conditioned on the hypothesis that the tested person man 19    is the parent father of the child; and 20        (2) the likelihood that the tested person man is not 21    the parent father, based on the genetic markers of the 22    tested person, parent who gave birth man, mother, and 23    child, conditioned on the hypothesis that the tested 24    person man is not the parent father of the child and that 25    the parent of the child father is of the same ethnic or 26    racial group as the tested person man.   HB2683- 4 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (g) "Commence" means to file the initial pleading seeking 2an adjudication of parentage in the circuit court of this 3State. 4    (h) "Determination of parentage" means the establishment 5of the parent-child relationship by the signing of a voluntary 6acknowledgment under Article 3 of this Act or adjudication by 7the court or as authorized under Article X of the Illinois 8Public Aid Code. 9    (i) "Donor" means a person who provides gametes intended 10for use in assisted reproduction, whether or not for 11compensation. "Donor" does not include a person who is a 12parent under Article 7 or an intended parent under the 13Gestational Surrogacy Act an individual who participates in an 14assisted reproductive technology arrangement by providing 15gametes and relinquishes all rights and responsibilities to 16the gametes so that another individual or individuals may 17become the legal parent or parents of any resulting child. 18"Donor" does not include a spouse in any assisted reproductive 19technology arrangement in which his or her spouse will parent 20any resulting child.21    (j) "Ethnic or racial group" means, for purposes of 22genetic testing, a recognized group that an individual 23identifies as all or part of the individual's ancestry or that 24is so identified by other information. 25    (k) "Gamete" means either a sperm or an egg. 26    (l) "Genetic testing" means an analysis of genetic markers   HB2683- 5 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1to exclude or identify a person man as the parent father or a 2woman as the mother of a child as provided in Article 4 of this 3Act. 4    (l-5) "Gestational surrogacy" means the process by which a 5person woman attempts to carry and give birth to a child 6created through in vitro fertilization in which the 7gestational surrogate has made no genetic contribution to any 8resulting child. 9    (m) "Gestational surrogate" means a person woman who is 10not an intended parent and agrees to engage in a gestational 11surrogacy arrangement pursuant to the terms of a valid 12gestational surrogacy arrangement under the Gestational 13Surrogacy Act. 14    (m-5) "Intended parent" means a person person who consents 15to enters into an assisted reproduction reproductive 16technology arrangement, including a gestational surrogacy 17agreement, such that the person is a arrangement, under which 18he or she will be the legal parent parent of the resulting 19child. "Intended parent" includes, in the case of a married 20couple, both spouses for all purposes under this Act. 21    (n) "Parent" means an individual who has established a 22parent-child relationship under Section 201 of this Act. 23    (o) "Parent-child relationship" means the legal 24relationship between a child and a parent of the child.25    (p) "Presumed parent" means an individual who, by 26operation of law under Section 204 of this Act, is recognized   HB2683- 6 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1as the parent of a child unless until that status is rebutted 2or confirmed in a judicial or administrative proceeding. 3    (q) "Probability of parentage paternity" means the 4measure, for the ethnic or racial group to which the alleged 5parent father belongs, of the probability that the person man 6in question is the parent father of the child, compared with a 7random, unrelated person and man of the same ethnic or racial 8group, expressed as a percentage incorporating the combined 9parentage paternity index and a prior probability. 10    (r) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a 11tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other 12medium and is retrievable in perceivable form. 13    (s) "Signatory" means an individual who authenticates a 14record and is bound by its terms. 15    (t) "State" means a state of the United States, the 16District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin 17Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the 18jurisdiction of the United States. 19    (u) "Substantially similar legal relationship" means a 20relationship recognized in this State under Section 60 of the 21Illinois Religious Freedom Protection and Civil Union Act.22    (v) "Support-enforcement agency" means a public official 23or agency authorized to seek: 24        (1) enforcement of support orders or laws relating to 25    the duty of support; 26        (2) establishment or modification of child support;   HB2683- 7 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1        (3) determination of parentage; or 2        (4) location of child-support obligors and their 3    income and assets. 4(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-763, eff. 1-1-17; 99-769, 5eff. 1-1-17; 100-201, eff. 8-18-17.) 6    (750 ILCS 46/105)7    Sec. 105. Authority to establish parentage. The circuit 8courts are authorized to establish parentage under this Act. 9The Department of Healthcare and Family Services may make an 10administrative determination of parentage determinations of 11paternity and nonpaternity in accordance with Section 10-17.7 12of the Illinois Public Aid Code. Such administrative 13determinations shall have the full force and effect of court 14judgments entered under this Act.15(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 16    (750 ILCS 46/107)17    Sec. 107. Applicability. Insofar as practicable, the 18provisions of this Act applicable to the parent father and 19child relationship shall apply equally without regard to 20gender to the mother and child relationship including, but not 21limited to, the obligation to support.22(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 23    (750 ILCS 46/201)  HB2683- 8 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    Sec. 201. Establishment of parent-child relationship. 2    (a) The parent-child relationship is established between a 3person woman and a child by: 4        (1) the person woman having given birth to the child, 5    except as otherwise provided in the Gestational Surrogacy 6    Act;7        (2) a presumption of the person's parentage of the 8    child under Section 204 of this Act unless the presumption 9    is overcome in a judicial proceeding or a valid denial of 10    parentage is made under Article 3 of this Act an 11    adjudication of the woman's parentage;12        (3) an effective voluntary acknowledgment of parentage 13    by the person under Article 3 of this Act, unless the 14    acknowledgment has been rescinded or successfully 15    challenged adoption of the child by the woman;16        (4) an adjudication of the person's parentage; a valid 17    gestational surrogacy arrangement that complies with the 18    Gestational Surrogacy Act or other law; or19        (5) the person's adoption of the child; an unrebutted 20    presumption of the woman's parentage of the child under 21    Section 204 of this Act22        (6) the person's consent to assisted reproduction 23    under Article 7 of this Act; or24        (7) the person's parentage of the child is established 25    under the provisions of the Gestational Surrogacy Act.26    (b) (Blank). The parent-child relationship is established   HB2683- 9 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1between a man and a child by: 2        (1) an unrebutted presumption of the man's parentage 3    of the child under Section 204 of this Act; 4        (2) an effective voluntary acknowledgment of paternity 5    by the man under Article 3 of this Act, unless the 6    acknowledgment has been rescinded or successfully 7    challenged; 8        (3) an adjudication of the man's parentage; 9        (4) adoption of the child by the man; or10        (5) a valid gestational surrogacy arrangement that 11    complies with the Gestational Surrogacy Act or other law.12    (c) (Blank). Insofar as practicable, the provisions of 13this Act applicable to parent-child relationships shall apply 14equally to men and women as parents, including, but not 15limited to, the obligation to support.16(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 17    (750 ILCS 46/204)18    Sec. 204. Presumption of parentage. 19    (a) A person is presumed to be the parent of a child if: 20        (1) the person and the person who gave birth to mother 21    of the child have entered into a marriage, civil union, or 22    substantially similar legal relationship, and the child is 23    born, to the person who gave birth to the child, mother 24    during the marriage, civil union, or substantially similar 25    legal relationship, except as provided in the Gestational   HB2683- 10 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    Surrogacy Act or other law;2        (2) the person and the person who gave birth to mother 3    of the child were in a marriage, civil union, or 4    substantially similar legal relationship and the child is 5    born, to the person who gave birth to the child, mother 6    within 300 days after the marriage, civil union, or 7    substantially similar legal relationship is terminated by 8    death, declaration of invalidity of marriage, judgment for 9    dissolution of marriage, civil union, or substantially 10    similar legal relationship, or after a judgment for legal 11    separation, except as provided in the Gestational 12    Surrogacy Act or other law; 13        (3) before the birth of the child, the person and the 14    person who gave birth to mother of the child entered into a 15    marriage, civil union, or substantially similar legal 16    relationship in apparent compliance with law, even if the 17    attempted marriage, civil union, or substantially similar 18    legal relationship is or could be declared invalid, and 19    the child is born during the invalid marriage, civil 20    union, or substantially similar legal relationship or 21    within 300 days after its termination by death, 22    declaration of invalidity of marriage, judgment for 23    dissolution of marriage, civil union, or substantially 24    similar legal relationship, or after a judgment for legal 25    separation, except as provided in the Gestational 26    Surrogacy Act or other law; or  HB2683- 11 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1        (4) after the child's birth, the person and the person 2    who gave birth to the child child's mother have entered 3    into a marriage, civil union, or substantially similar 4    legal relationship, even if the marriage, civil union, or 5    substantially similar legal relationship is or could be 6    declared invalid, and the person is named, with the 7    person's written consent, as the child's parent on the 8    child's birth certificate.9        (5) The person, jointly with another parent, resided 10    in the same household with the child and openly held out 11    the child as the person's own child from the time the child 12    was born or adopted and for a period of at least 2 years 13    thereafter, including any period of temporary absence. 14    (b) If 2 or more conflicting presumptions arise under this 15Section, the presumption which on the facts is founded on the 16weightier considerations of policy and logic, especially the 17policy of promoting the child's best interests, controls.18(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 19    (750 ILCS 46/205)20    Sec. 205. Proceedings to declare the non-existence of the 21parent-child relationship. 22    (a) An action to declare the non-existence of the 23parent-child relationship may be brought by the child, the 24person who gave birth to the child mother, or a person presumed 25to be a parent under Section 204 of this Act. Actions brought   HB2683- 12 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1by the child, the person who gave birth to the child mother, or 2a presumed parent shall be brought by verified complaint, 3which shall be designated a petition. After a presumption 4under Section 204 of this Act has been rebutted, parentage of 5the child by another person man or woman may be established in 6the same action, if such person he or she has been made a 7party.8    (b) An action to declare the non-existence of the 9parent-child relationship brought under subsection (a) of this 10Section shall be barred if brought later than 2 years after the 11petitioner knew or should have known of the relevant facts. 12The 2-year period for bringing an action to declare the 13non-existence of the parent-child relationship shall not 14extend beyond the date on which the child reaches the age of 18 15years. Failure to bring an action within 2 years shall not bar 16any party from asserting a defense in any action to declare the 17existence of the parent-child relationship.18    (c) An action to declare the non-existence of the 19parent-child relationship may be brought subsequent to an 20adjudication of parentage in any judgment by the person man 21adjudicated to be the parent pursuant to a presumption in 22paragraphs (a)(1) through (a)(4) of Section 204 if, as a 23result of deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing, it is 24discovered that the person man adjudicated to be the parent is 25not the parent father of the child. Actions brought by the 26adjudicated parent father shall be brought by verified   HB2683- 13 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1petition. If, as a result of the deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) 2testing that is admissible under Section 614 of this Act, the 3petitioner is determined not to be the parent father of the 4child, the adjudication of parentage paternity and any orders 5regarding the allocation of parental responsibilities, 6parenting time, and future payments of support may be vacated. 7This provision shall not apply to actions involving parentage 8of children born through assisted reproduction. 9    (d) An action to declare the non-existence of the 10parent-child relationship brought under subsection (c) of this 11Section shall be barred if brought more than 2 years after the 12petitioner obtains actual knowledge of relevant facts. The 132-year period shall not apply to periods of time where the 14person who gave birth to the child mother or the child refuses 15to submit to deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing. The 2-year 16period for bringing an action to declare the non-existence of 17the parent-child relationship shall not extend beyond the date 18on which the child reaches the age of 18 years. 19(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 20    (750 ILCS 46/206)21    Sec. 206. Presumption; burden of proof. A person 22challenging a presumption under Section 204 of this Act may 23rebut the presumption with a preponderance of the clear and 24convincing evidence.25(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.)   HB2683- 14 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (750 ILCS 46/301)2    Sec. 301. Voluntary acknowledgment. A parent-child 3relationship may be established voluntarily by the signing and 4witnessing of a voluntary acknowledgment in accordance with 5Section 12 of the Vital Records Act and Section 10-17.7 of the 6Illinois Public Aid Code. A person who gave birth to a child 7and an alleged genetic parent of the child, a presumed parent 8under Section 204, or an intended parent under Article 7, may 9sign an acknowledgment of parentage to establish the parentage 10of the child. The voluntary acknowledgment shall contain the 11social security numbers or tax identification numbers of the 12persons signing the voluntary acknowledgment; however, failure 13to include the social security numbers of the persons signing 14a voluntary acknowledgment does not invalidate the voluntary 15acknowledgment.16(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 17    (750 ILCS 46/302)18    Sec. 302. Execution of voluntary acknowledgment. 19    (a) A voluntary acknowledgment described in Section 301 of 20this Act must: 21        (1) be in a record; 22        (2) be signed, or otherwise authenticated, under 23    penalty of perjury by the person who gave birth to the 24    child mother and by the person man seeking to establish   HB2683- 15 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    his parentage; 2        (3) state that the child whose parentage is being 3    acknowledged: 4            (A) does not have a presumed parent, or has a 5        presumed parent whose full name is stated; and 6            (B) does not have another acknowledged or 7        adjudicated parent; 8        (4) be witnessed; and 9        (5) state that the signatories understand that the 10    voluntary acknowledgment is the equivalent of a judicial 11    adjudication of parentage of the child and that: (i) a 12    challenge by a signatory to the voluntary acknowledgment 13    may be permitted only upon a showing of fraud, duress, or 14    material mistake of fact; and (ii) a challenge to the 15    voluntary acknowledgment is barred after 2 years unless 16    that period is tolled pursuant to the law. 17    (b) An acknowledgment is void if it: 18        (1) states that another person is a presumed parent, 19    unless a denial signed or otherwise authenticated by the 20    presumed parent is filed with the Department of Healthcare 21    and Family Services, as provided by law; 22        (2) states that another person is an acknowledged or 23    adjudicated parent; or 24        (3) falsely denies the existence of a presumed, 25    acknowledged, or adjudicated parent of the child. 26    (c) A presumed parent father may sign or otherwise   HB2683- 16 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1authenticate a voluntary acknowledgment. 2(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 3    (750 ILCS 46/303)4    Sec. 303. Denial of parentage. A presumed parent may sign 5a denial of parentage. The denial is valid only if:6        (a) a voluntary acknowledgment described in Section 7    301 of this Act signed, or otherwise authenticated, by a 8    person man is filed pursuant to Section 305 of this Act; 9        (b) the denial is in a record, and is signed, or 10    otherwise authenticated, under penalty of perjury; and 11        (c) the presumed parent has not previously: 12            (1) acknowledged his parentage, unless the 13        previous voluntary acknowledgment has been rescinded 14        under Section 307 of this Act or successfully 15        challenged under Section 308 of this Act; or 16            (2) been adjudicated to be the parent of the 17        child. 18(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 19    (750 ILCS 46/305)20    Sec. 305. Effect of voluntary acknowledgment or denial of 21parentage. 22    (a) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 307 and 308 23of this Act, a valid voluntary acknowledgment filed with the 24Department of Healthcare and Family Services, as provided by   HB2683- 17 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1law, is equivalent to an adjudication of the parentage of a 2child and confers upon the acknowledged parent father all of 3the rights and duties of a parent. 4    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, 5parentage established in accordance with Section 301 of this 6Act has the full force and effect of a judgment entered under 7this Act and serves as a basis for seeking a child support 8order without any further proceedings to establish parentage. 9    (c) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 307 and 308 10of this Act, a valid denial by a presumed parent filed with the 11Department of Healthcare and Family Services, as provided by 12law, in conjunction with a voluntary acknowledgment, is 13equivalent to an adjudication of the nonparentage of the 14presumed parent and discharges the presumed parent from all 15rights and duties of a parent. 16(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 17    (750 ILCS 46/401)18    Sec. 401. Proceeding authorized. As soon as practicable, a 19court or an administrative hearing officer in an Expedited 20Child Support System may, and upon the request of a party 21except as provided in Section 610 of this Act, or of the child, 22shall order or direct the parent who gave birth to the child 23mother, the child, and the alleged parent father to submit to 24deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing to determine inherited 25characteristics. If any party refuses to submit to genetic   HB2683- 18 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1testing, the court may resolve the question of parentage 2paternity against that party or enforce its order if the 3rights of others and the interests of justice so require. 4Genetic testing may not be used to: (1) challenge the 5parentage of a person who is a parent under Article 7 or the 6Gestational Surrogacy Act, inclusive; or (2) establish the 7parentage of a person who is a donor. 8(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 9    (750 ILCS 46/402)10    Sec. 402. Requirements for genetic testing. 11    (a) The genetic testing shall be conducted by an expert 12qualified as an examiner of blood or tissue types and 13appointed by the court. The expert shall determine the genetic 14testing procedures. However, any interested party, for good 15cause shown, in advance of the scheduled genetic testing, may 16request a hearing to object to the qualifications of the 17expert or the genetic testing procedures. The expert appointed 18by the court shall testify at the pre-test hearing at the 19expense of the party requesting the hearing, except for an 20indigent party as provided in Section 405 of this Act. An 21expert not appointed by the court shall testify at the 22pre-test hearing at the expense of the party retaining the 23expert. Inquiry into an expert's qualifications at the 24pre-test hearing shall not affect either party's right to have 25the expert qualified at trial.   HB2683- 19 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (b) Genetic testing must be of a type reasonably relied 2upon by experts in the field of genetic testing and performed 3in a testing laboratory accredited by the American Association 4of Blood Banks or a successor to its functions. 5    (c) A specimen used in genetic testing may consist of one 6or more samples, or a combination of samples, of blood, buccal 7cells, bone, hair, or other body tissue or fluid. 8    (d) The testing laboratory shall determine the databases 9from which to select frequencies for use in calculation of the 10probability of parentage paternity based on the ethnic or 11racial group of an individual or individuals. If there is 12disagreement as to the testing laboratory's choice, the 13following rules apply: 14        (1) The individual objecting may require the testing 15    laboratory, within 30 days after receipt of the report of 16    the genetic testing, to recalculate the probability of 17    parentage paternity using an ethnic or racial group 18    different from that used by the laboratory. 19        (2) The individual objecting to the testing 20    laboratory's initial choice shall: 21            (A) if the frequencies are not available to the 22        testing laboratory for the ethnic or racial group 23        requested, provide the requested frequencies compiled 24        in a manner recognized by accrediting bodies; or 25            (B) engage another testing laboratory to perform 26        the calculations.   HB2683- 20 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (e) If, after recalculation using a different ethnic or 2racial group, genetic testing does not reputably identify a 3person man as the parent father of a child, an individual who 4has been tested may be required to submit to additional 5genetic testing. 6(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 7    (750 ILCS 46/403)8    Sec. 403. Genetic test results. 9    (a) The expert shall prepare a written report of the 10genetic test results. If the genetic test results show that 11the alleged parent father is not excluded, the report shall 12contain statistics based upon the statistical formula of 13combined parentage paternity index (CPI) and the probability 14of parentage paternity as determined by the probability of 15exclusion (Random Person Man Not Excluded = RPNE RMNE). The 16expert may be called by the court as a witness to testify to 17the expert's his or her findings and, if called, shall be 18subject to cross-examination by the parties. If the genetic 19test results show that the alleged parent father is not 20excluded, any party may demand that other experts, qualified 21as examiners of blood or tissue types, perform independent 22genetic testing under order of court, including, but not 23limited to, blood types or other testing of genetic markers. 24The results of the genetic testing may be offered into 25evidence. The number and qualifications of the experts shall   HB2683- 21 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1be determined by the court. 2    (b) Documentation of the chain of custody of the blood or 3tissue samples, accompanied by an affidavit or certification 4in accordance with Section 1-109 of the Code of Civil 5Procedure, is competent evidence to establish the chain of 6custody. 7    (c) The report of the genetic test results prepared by the 8appointed expert shall be made by affidavit or by 9certification as provided in Section 1-109 of the Code of 10Civil Procedure and shall be mailed to all parties. A proof of 11service shall be filed with the court. The verified report 12shall be admitted into evidence at trial without foundation 13testimony or other proof of authenticity or accuracy, unless a 14written motion challenging the admissibility of the report is 15filed by either party within 28 days of receipt of the report, 16in which case expert testimony shall be required. A party may 17not file such a motion challenging the admissibility of the 18report later than 28 days before commencement of trial. Before 19trial, the court shall determine whether the motion is 20sufficient to deny admission of the report by verification. 21Failure to make that timely motion constitutes a waiver of the 22right to object to admission by verification and shall not be 23grounds for a continuance of the hearing to establish 24parentage paternity. 25(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.)   HB2683- 22 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (750 ILCS 46/404)2    Sec. 404. Effect of genetic testing. Genetic testing taken 3under this Article shall have the following effect:4        (a) If the court finds that the conclusion of the 5    expert or experts, as disclosed by the evidence based upon 6    the genetic testing, is that the alleged parent father is 7    not the parent of the child, the question of parentage 8    paternity shall be resolved accordingly. 9        (b) If the experts disagree in their findings or 10    conclusions, the question shall be weighed with other 11    competent evidence of parentage paternity. 12        (c) If the genetic testing results indicate that the 13    alleged parent father is not excluded and that the 14    combined parentage paternity index is at least 1,000 to 1, 15    and there is at least a 99.9% probability of parentage 16    paternity, the alleged parent father is presumed to be the 17    parent father, and this evidence shall be admitted. 18        (d) A person man identified under subsection (c) of 19    this Section as the parent father of the child may rebut 20    the genetic testing results by other genetic testing 21    satisfying the requirements of this Article which: 22            (1) excludes the person man as a genetic parent 23        father of the child; or 24            (2) identifies another person man as the possible 25        parent father of the child. 26        (e) Except as otherwise provided in this Article, if   HB2683- 23 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    more than one person man is identified by genetic testing 2    as the possible parent father of the child, the court 3    shall order them to submit to further genetic testing to 4    identify the genetic parent father. 5(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 6    (750 ILCS 46/405)7    Sec. 405. Cost of genetic testing. The expense of the 8genetic testing shall be paid by the party who requests the 9genetic testing, except that the court may apportion the costs 10between the parties, upon request. When the genetic testing is 11requested by the party seeking to establish parentage 12paternity and that party is found to be indigent by the court, 13the expense shall be paid by the public agency providing 14representation; except that where a public agency is not 15providing representation, the expense shall be paid by the 16county in which the action is brought. When the genetic 17testing is ordered by the court on its own motion or is 18requested by the alleged or presumed parent father and that 19parent father is found to be indigent by the court, the expense 20shall be paid by the county in which the action is brought. Any 21part of the expense may be taxed as costs in the action, except 22that no costs may be taxed against a public agency that has not 23requested the genetic testing.24(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.)   HB2683- 24 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (750 ILCS 46/407)2    Sec. 407. Independent genetic testing. Nothing in this 3Article shall prevent a party from obtaining genetic testing 4of the party's his or her own blood or tissue independent of 5those ordered by the court or from presenting expert testimony 6interpreting those tests or any other blood tests ordered 7under this Article. Reports of all the independent tests, 8accompanied by affidavit or certification pursuant to Section 91-109 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and notice of any expert 10witnesses to be called to testify to the results of those tests 11shall be submitted to all parties at least 30 days before any 12hearing set to determine the issue of parentage.13(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 14    (750 ILCS 46/408)15    Sec. 408. Additional persons to be tested. 16    (a) Subject to subsection (b), if a genetic-testing 17specimen is not available from a person man who may be the 18parent father of a child, for good cause and under 19circumstances the court considers to be just, the court may 20order the following individuals to submit specimens for 21genetic testing: 22        (1) the parents of the person man; 23        (2) brothers and sisters of the person man; 24        (3) other children of the person and the parent who 25    gave birth to the person man and their mothers; and  HB2683- 25 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1        (4) other relatives of the person man necessary to 2    complete genetic testing. 3    (b) Issuance of an order under this Section requires a 4finding that a need for genetic testing outweighs the 5legitimate interests of the individual sought to be tested, 6and in no event shall an order be issued until the individual 7is joined as a party and given notice as required under the 8Code of Civil Procedure. 9(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 10    (750 ILCS 46/501)11    Sec. 501. Temporary orders. 12    (a) On a motion by a party and a showing of clear and 13convincing evidence of parentage, the court shall issue a 14temporary order for support of a child, including a non-minor 15child with a disability, if the order is appropriate and the 16individual ordered to pay support is: 17        (1) a presumed parent of the child; 18        (2) petitioning to have parentage adjudicated; 19        (3) identified as the parent father through genetic 20    testing under Article 4 of this Act; 21        (4) an alleged parent father who has declined to 22    submit to genetic testing; 23        (5) shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the 24    child's parent father; 25        (6) the parent who gave birth to mother of the child   HB2683- 26 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    except under the Gestational Surrogacy Act; or 2        (7) anyone else determined to be the child's parent. 3    In determining the amount of a temporary child support 4award, the court shall use the guidelines and standards set 5forth in Sections 505, 505.2, and 513.5 of the Illinois 6Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act. 7    (b) A temporary order may include provisions for the 8allocation of parental responsibilities and parenting time as 9provided by the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage 10Act. A temporary order may, in accordance with the provisions 11of subsection (a) of Section 508 of the Illinois Marriage and 12Dissolution of Marriage Act that relate to proceedings other 13than pre-judgment dissolution proceedings, include an award 14for interim attorney's fees and costs. 15    (c) Temporary orders issued under this Section shall not 16have prejudicial effect with respect to final child support, 17the allocation of parental responsibilities, or parenting time 18orders. 19(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 20    (750 ILCS 46/502)21    Sec. 502. Injunctive relief. 22    (a) In any action brought under this Act for the initial 23determination of parentage, the allocation of parental 24responsibilities or parenting time, or for modification of a 25prior allocation order or judgment or parenting time order,   HB2683- 27 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1the court, upon application of a party, may enjoin a party 2having physical possession or an allocation order or judgment 3from temporarily relocating the child from this State pending 4the adjudication of the issues of parentage, the allocation of 5parental responsibilities, and parenting time. When deciding 6whether to enjoin relocation of a child, or to order a party to 7return the child to this State, the court shall consider 8factors including, but not limited to: 9        (1) the extent of previous involvement with the child 10    by the party seeking to enjoin relocation or to have the 11    absent party return the child to this State; 12        (2) the likelihood that parentage will be established; 13    and 14        (3) the impact on the financial, physical, and 15    emotional health of the party being enjoined from 16    relocating the child or the party being ordered to return 17    the child to this State. 18    (b) A temporary restraining order or preliminary 19injunction under this Act shall be governed by the relevant 20provisions of Part 1 of Article XI of the Code of Civil 21Procedure.22    (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of 23this Section, the court may decline to enjoin a domestic 24violence victim having physical possession or an allocation 25order or judgment from temporarily or permanently relocating 26the child from this State pending an allocation of parental   HB2683- 28 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1responsibilities or an adjudication of parenting time. In 2determining whether a person is a domestic violence victim, 3the court shall consider the following factors: 4        (1) a sworn statement by the person that the person 5    has good reason to believe that the person he or she is the 6    victim of domestic violence or stalking; 7        (2) a sworn statement that the person fears for the 8    person's his or her safety or the safety of the person's 9    his or her children; 10        (3) evidence from police, court, or other government 11    agency records or files; 12        (4) documentation from a domestic violence program if 13    the person is alleged to be a victim of domestic violence; 14        (5) documentation from a legal, clerical, medical, or 15    other professional from whom the person has sought 16    assistance in dealing with the alleged domestic violence; 17    and 18        (6) any other evidence that supports the sworn 19    statements, such as a statement from any other individual 20    with knowledge of the circumstances that provides the 21    basis for the claim, or physical evidence of the domestic 22    violence. 23(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 24    (750 ILCS 46/601)25    Sec. 601. Proceeding authorized. A civil proceeding may be   HB2683- 29 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1maintained to adjudicate the parentage of a child. The 2proceeding is governed by the Code of Civil Procedure and 3Illinois Supreme Court Rules. Administrative proceedings 4adjudicating parentage paternity shall be governed by Section 510-17.7 of the Illinois Public Aid Code.6(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 7    (750 ILCS 46/602)8    Sec. 602. Standing. A complaint to adjudicate parentage 9shall be verified, shall be designated a petition, and shall 10name the person or persons alleged to be the parent of the 11child. Subject to Article 3 and Sections 607, 608, and 609 of 12this Act, a proceeding to adjudicate parentage may be 13maintained by:14        (a) the child;15        (b) the person who gave birth to mother of the child;16        (c) a pregnant person woman;17        (d) a person man presumed or alleged alleging himself 18    to be the parent of the child; 19        (e) a woman presumed or alleging herself to be the 20    parent of the child;21        (e) (f) the support-enforcement agency or other 22    governmental agency authorized by other law;23        (f) (g) any person or public agency that has physical 24    possession of or has custody of or has been allocated 25    parental responsibilities for, is providing financial   HB2683- 30 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    support to, or has provided financial support to the 2    child;3        (g) (h) the Department of Healthcare and Family 4    Services if it is providing, or has provided, financial 5    support to the child or if it is assisting with child 6    support collections services;7        (h) (i) an authorized adoption agency or licensed 8    child welfare agency;9        (i) (j) a representative authorized by law to act for 10    an individual who would otherwise be entitled to maintain 11    a proceeding but who is deceased, incapacitated, or a 12    minor; or13        (j) (k) an intended parent.14(Source: P.A. 103-501, eff. 1-1-24.) 15    (750 ILCS 46/603)16    Sec. 603. Subject matter and personal jurisdiction. 17    (a) The circuit courts of this State shall have 18jurisdiction of an action brought under this Act. In a civil 19action not brought under this Act, the provisions of this Act 20shall apply if parentage is at issue. The court may join any 21action under this Act with any other civil action in which this 22Act is applicable.23    (b) An individual may not be adjudicated to be a parent 24unless the court has personal jurisdiction over the 25individual.   HB2683- 31 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (c) A court of this State having jurisdiction to 2adjudicate parentage may exercise personal jurisdiction over a 3nonresident individual, or the guardian or conservator of the 4individual, if the conditions prescribed in Section 201 of the 5Uniform Interstate Family Support Act exist, including, but 6not limited to: if the individual engaged in sexual 7intercourse in this State and the child may have been 8conceived by that act if intercourse; the individual consented 9to assisted reproduction that occurred in this State that 10resulted in the conception of the child; if the individual 11consented to a medical procedure that occurred in this State 12related to assisted reproduction that resulted in the 13conception of the child; if the child was born or is 14anticipated to be born in this State; an individual consented 15to a mental health consultation that occurred in this State 16pursuant to the Gestational Surrogacy Act, or there is any 17other basis consistent with the constitutions of this State 18and the United States for the exercise of personal 19jurisdiction are fulfilled. 20    (d) Lack of jurisdiction over one individual does not 21preclude the court from making an adjudication of parentage 22binding on another individual over whom the court has personal 23jurisdiction. 24(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 25    (750 ILCS 46/604)  HB2683- 32 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    Sec. 604. Venue. 2    (a) Venue for a proceeding to adjudicate parentage is 3proper in any county of this State in which: a medical 4procedure or mental health consultation occurs under the 5Gestational Surrogacy Act or Article 7 of this Act; a party 6resides; the child resides or is located; the child is born or 7anticipated to be born; , or, if the presumed or alleged parent 8father is deceased, in which a proceeding for probate or 9administration of the presumed or alleged parent's father's 10estate has been commenced, or could be commenced.11    (b) A proceeding for the allocation of parental 12responsibilities is commenced in the county where the child 13resides.14(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 15    (750 ILCS 46/605)16    Sec. 605. Notice to presumed parent. 17    (a) Except in cases governed under the Gestational 18Surrogacy Act, the petitioner shall give notice of a 19proceeding to adjudicate parentage to the following 20individuals:21        (1) the individual who gave birth to the child, unless 22    a court has adjudicated that the individual is not a 23    parent;24        (2) an individual who is a parent of the child under 25    this act;  HB2683- 33 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1        (3) a presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parent of 2    the child; and3        (4) an individual whose parentage is to be 4    adjudicated.5    (b) An individual entitled to notice under subsection (a) 6has a right to intervene in the proceeding.7    (c) Lack of notice required by subsection (a) does not 8render a judgment void. Lack of notice does not preclude an 9individual entitled to notice under subsection (a) from 10bringing a proceeding under subsection (b) of Section 609. 11    (d) A In any action brought under Article 3 or Article 6 of 12this Act where the individual signing the petition for an 13order establishing the existence of the parent-child 14relationship by consent or the individual alleged to be the 15parent in a petition is different from an individual who is 16presumed to be the parent of the child under Article 2 of this 17Act, a notice required by this Section shall be served on the 18individual presumed parent in the same manner as summonses are 19served in other civil proceedings or, in lieu of personal 20service, service may be made as follows:21        (1) The petitioner person requesting notice shall pay 22    to the clerk of the circuit court a mailing fee of $1.50 23    and furnish to the clerk of the circuit court an original 24    and one copy of a notice together with an affidavit 25    setting forth the individual's presumed parent's last 26    known address. The original notice shall be retained by   HB2683- 34 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    the clerk of the circuit court.2        (2) The clerk of the circuit court shall promptly mail 3    to the individual presumed parent, at the address 4    appearing in the affidavit, the copy of the notice by 5    certified mail, return receipt requested. The envelope and 6    return receipt shall bear the return address of the clerk 7    of the circuit court. The receipt for certified mail shall 8    state the name and address of the addressee and the date of 9    mailing and shall be attached to the original notice.10        (3) The return receipt, when returned to the clerk of 11    the circuit court, shall be attached to the original 12    notice and shall constitute proof of service.13        (4) The clerk of the circuit court shall note the fact 14    of service in a permanent record.15    (e) (b) The notice shall read as follows:16    "IN THE MATTER OF NOTICE TO .......... INDIVIDUAL PRESUMED 17PARENT. 18    You have been identified as an individual with a claim to 19parentage the presumed parent of ........., born on ......... 20The birth parent who gave birth to of the child is ......... 21    An action is being brought to establish the parent-child 22relationship between the named child and a parent named by the 23person filing this action, .........24    You may As the presumed parent, you have certain legal 25rights with respect to the named child, including the right to 26notice of the filing of proceedings instituted for the   HB2683- 35 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1establishment of parentage of the named child and, in some 2situations if named as a parent in a petition to establish 3parentage, the right to submit to, along with the birth parent 4who gave birth to the child and the child, deoxyribonucleic 5acid (DNA) tests to determine inherited characteristics, 6subject to Section 610 of the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015. 7If you wish to assert your rights with respect to the child 8named in this notice, you must file with the Clerk of this 9Circuit Court of ......... County, Illinois, whose address is 10........, within 30 days after the date of receipt of this 11notice, a declaration of parentage stating that you are, in 12fact, the parent of the named child and that you intend to 13assert your legal rights with respect to the child, or that you 14request to be notified of any further proceedings with respect 15to the parentage of the child.16    If you do not file a declaration of parentage or a request 17for notice, then you may be later barred from asserting 18parentage claims whatever legal rights you have with respect 19to the named child, and including the right to notice of any 20future proceedings for the establishment of parentage of the 21child, may be terminated without any further notice to you. 22When your legal rights with respect to the named child are 23terminated, you will not be entitled to notice of any future 24proceedings.".25    (f) (c) The notice to a presumed parent under this Section 26in any action brought by a public agency shall be prepared and   HB2683- 36 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1mailed by the public agency, and the mailing fee to the clerk 2of the circuit court shall be waived.3(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 4    (750 ILCS 46/606)5    Sec. 606. Summons. The summons that is served on a 6respondent shall include the return date on or by which the 7respondent must appear and shall contain the following 8information, in a prominent place and in conspicuous language, 9in addition to the information required to be provided under 10the laws of this State: "If you do not appear as instructed in 11this summons, you may be required to support the child named in 12this petition until the child is at least 18 years old. You may 13also have to pay the pregnancy and delivery costs of the parent 14who gave birth mother.".15(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 16    (750 ILCS 46/608)17    Sec. 608. Limitation; child having presumed parent. 18    (a) An alleged parent father, as that term is defined in 19Section 103 of this Act, must commence an action to establish a 20parent-child relationship for a child having a presumed parent 21not later than 2 years after the petitioner knew or should have 22known of the relevant facts. The time the petitioner is under 23legal disability or duress or the ground for relief is 24fraudulently concealed shall be excluded in computing the   HB2683- 37 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1period of 2 years. 2    (b) A proceeding seeking to declare the non-existence of 3the parent-child relationship between a child and the child's 4presumed parent father may be maintained at any time by a 5person described in paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection 6(a) of Section 204 of this Act if the court determines that the 7presumed parent father and the person who gave birth to mother 8of the child neither cohabited nor engaged in sexual 9intercourse with each other during the probable time of 10conception.11    (c) An adjudication under this Section shall serve as a 12rebuttal or confirmation of a presumed parent as defined in 13subsection (p) of Section 103.14(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 15    (750 ILCS 46/609)16    Sec. 609. Limitation; child having acknowledged or 17adjudicated parent. 18    (a) If a child has an acknowledged parent, a signatory to 19the acknowledgment described in Section 301 of this Act or 20related denial may commence a proceeding seeking to challenge 21the acknowledgment or denial or challenge the parentage 22paternity of the child only within the time allowed under 23Section 309 of this Act.24    (b) If a child has an acknowledged parent or an 25adjudicated parent, an individual, other than the child, who   HB2683- 38 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1is neither a signatory to the acknowledgment nor a party to the 2adjudication and who seeks an adjudication of parentage of the 3child must commence a proceeding not later than 2 years after 4the effective date of the acknowledgment or adjudication.5    (c) A proceeding under this Section is subject to the 6application of the principles of estoppel established in 7Section 610 of this Act.8(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 9    (750 ILCS 46/610)10    Sec. 610. Factors in adjudicating parentage Authority to 11deny motion for genetic testing. 12    (a) Consistent with Sections 205, 309, 608, and 609, in 13cases in which there are competing claims to parentage and in 14proceedings In a proceeding in which the parentage of a child 15having a presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parent is at 16issue, the court shall consider the following factors when 17adjudicating the individual's parentage may deny a motion by a 18parent, presumed parent, acknowledged parent, adjudicated 19parent, alleged parent, or the child seeking an order for 20genetic testing of the parents and child if the court 21determines that: 22        (1) whether the conduct of the parent, acknowledged 23    parent, adjudicated parent, or the presumed parent estops 24    that party from denying parentage;25        (2) whether it would be inequitable to disprove the   HB2683- 39 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    parent-child relationship between the child and the 2    presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parent; and3        (3) it is in the child's best interests to adjudicate 4    the individual to be the child's parent, to deny genetic 5    testing, taking into account the following factors:6            (A) the length of time between the current 7        proceeding to adjudicate parentage and the time that 8        the presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parent was 9        placed on notice that this parent he or she might not 10        be the biological parent; 11            (B) the length of time during which the presumed, 12        acknowledged, or adjudicated parent has assumed the 13        role of parent of the child; 14            (C) the facts surrounding the presumed, 15        acknowledged, or adjudicated parent's discovery of his 16        or her possible non-parentage nonparentage; 17            (D) the nature of the relationship between the 18        child and the presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated 19        parent; 20            (E) the age of the child; 21            (F) the harm that may result to the child if the 22        presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parentage is 23        successfully disproved; 24            (G) the nature of the relationship between the 25        child and any alleged parent; 26            (H) the extent to which the passage of time   HB2683- 40 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1        reduces the chances of establishing the parentage of 2        another person and a child support obligation in favor 3        of the child;4            (I) other factors that may affect the equities 5        arising from the disruption of the parent-child 6        relationship between the child and the presumed, 7        acknowledged, or adjudicated parent or the chance of 8        other harm to the child; and 9            (J) any other factors the court determines to be 10        equitable.11        (b) Consistent with the establishment of parentage 12    under this Act, a court may determine that a child has more 13    than 2 parents if the court finds that it is in the best 14    interests of the child to do so. A finding of best 15    interests of the child under this subsection does not 16    require a finding of unfitness of any parent or person 17    seeking an adjudication of parentage. A determination of 18    best interests may include consideration of evidence of 19    prebirth intent to parent the child. 20    (c) (b) In a proceeding involving the application of this 21Section, a minor or incapacitated child must be represented by 22a guardian ad litem, child's representative, or attorney for 23the child. It shall be presumed to be equitable and in the best 24interests of the child to grant a motion by the child seeking 25an order for genetic testing. The presumption may be overcome 26by clear and convincing evidence that extraordinary   HB2683- 41 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1circumstances exist making the genetic testing contrary to the 2child's best interests. The court's order denying a child's 3request for genetic testing must state the basis for the 4denial upon which the presumption was overcome. The court's 5order granting a child's request for genetic testing must 6specify the ways in which the testing results may be used for 7purposes of protecting the child's best interests.8    (d) (Blank). (c) If the court denies a motion seeking an 9order for genetic testing, it shall issue an order 10adjudicating the presumed parent to be the parent of the 11child. 12(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 13    (750 ILCS 46/612)14    Sec. 612. Proceeding before birth. Except as otherwise 15provided for in this Act, a A proceeding to establish 16parentage may be commenced before the birth of the child, but 17may not be concluded until after the birth of the child. The 18following actions may be taken before the birth of the child:19        (a) service of process; 20        (b) the taking of depositions to perpetuate testimony; 21    and 22        (c) except as prohibited by Article 4 of this Act, 23    collection of specimens for genetic testing. 24(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.)   HB2683- 42 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (750 ILCS 46/614)2    Sec. 614. Admissibility of results of genetic testing; 3expenses. 4    (a) Subject to the limitations of Section 401, if If a 5child has a presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parent, the 6results of genetic testing are inadmissible to adjudicate 7parentage unless performed: 8        (1) with the consent of both the parent who gave birth 9    to the child mother and the presumed, acknowledged, or 10    adjudicated parent; or 11        (2) pursuant to an order of the court under Section 12    402 of this Act. 13    (b) Copies of bills for genetic testing and for prenatal 14and postnatal health care for the parent who gave birth mother 15and the child, which are furnished to the adverse party not 16less than 10 days before the date of a hearing are admissible 17to establish: 18        (1) the amount of the charges billed; and 19        (2) that the charges were reasonable, necessary, and 20    customary. 21    (c) Certified copies of the bills for costs incurred for 22pregnancy and childbirth shall be admitted into evidence at 23judicial or administrative proceedings without foundation 24testimony or other proof of authenticity or accuracy.25(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.)   HB2683- 43 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (750 ILCS 46/615)2    Sec. 615. Consequences of declining genetic testing. 3    (a) Subject to the limitations of Section 401, an An order 4for genetic testing is enforceable through a proceeding for 5adjudication of contempt. 6    (b) If an individual whose parentage is being determined 7declines to submit to genetic testing ordered by the court or 8administrative agency, the court or administrative agency may 9adjudicate parentage contrary to the position of that 10individual. 11    (c) Genetic testing of the parent who gave birth to the 12mother of a child is not a condition precedent to genetically 13testing the child and a person man whose parentage paternity 14is being determined. If the parent who gave birth to the child 15mother is unavailable or declines to submit to genetic 16testing, the court or administrative agency may order the 17genetic testing of the child and every person man whose 18parentage paternity is being adjudicated. 19(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 20    (750 ILCS 46/617)21    Sec. 617. Rules for adjudication of parentage. In a 22proceeding involving an alleged genetic parent, if the 23individual who gave birth to the child is the only other 24individual with a claim to parentage, the The court shall 25apply the following rules to adjudicate a claim of the   HB2683- 44 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1parentage of a child:2        (a) The parentage of a child having an adjudicated 3    parent may be disproved only by admissible results of 4    genetic testing, or other means, excluding that person as 5    the parent of the child or identifying another person as 6    the parent of the child. 7        (b) Unless the results of the genetic testing or other 8    evidence are admitted to rebut other results of genetic 9    testing, a person identified as the parent of a child 10    under Section 404 of this Act may be adjudicated the 11    parent of the child. 12        (c) If the court finds that genetic testing under 13    Section 404 neither identifies nor excludes a person as 14    the parent of a child, the court may not dismiss the 15    proceeding. In that event, the results of genetic testing 16    and other evidence are admissible to adjudicate the issue 17    of parentage. 18        (d) Unless the results of genetic testing are admitted 19    to rebut other results of genetic testing, a person 20    excluded as the parent of a child by genetic testing may be 21    adjudicated not to be the parent of the child. 22(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 23    (750 ILCS 46/621)24    Sec. 621. Binding effect of determination of parentage. 25    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this   HB2683- 45 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1Section, a determination of parentage is binding on: 2        (1) all signatories to an acknowledgment or denial as 3    provided in Article 3 of this Act; and 4        (2) all parties to an adjudication by a court acting 5    under circumstances that satisfy the jurisdictional 6    requirements of Section 201 of the Uniform Interstate 7    Family Support Act. 8    (b) A child is not bound by a determination of parentage 9under this Act unless: 10        (1) the determination was based on an unrescinded 11    acknowledgment as provided in Article 3 of this Act and 12    the acknowledgment is either consistent with the results 13    of genetic testing or for a child born through assisted 14    reproduction; 15        (2) the adjudication of parentage was based on a 16    finding consistent with the results of genetic testing and 17    the consistency is declared in the determination or is 18    otherwise shown;19        (3) the child was a party or was represented in the 20    proceeding determining parentage by a guardian ad litem, 21    child's representative or attorney for the child; and 22        (4) the child was no longer a minor at the time the 23    proceeding was initiated and was the moving party 24    resulting in the parentage determination; and 25        (5) the determination of parentage was made under 26    Article 7 or the Gestational Surrogacy Act.  HB2683- 46 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (c) In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, civil 2union, or substantially similar legal relationship, 3declaration of invalidity of marriage, civil union, or 4substantially similar legal relationship, or legal separation, 5the court is deemed to have made an adjudication of the 6parentage of a child if the court acts under circumstances 7that satisfy the jurisdictional requirements of Section 201 of 8the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, and the final 9order: 10        (1) expressly identifies a child as a "child of the 11    marriage, civil union, or substantially similar legal 12    relationship", "issue of the marriage, civil union, or 13    substantially similar legal relationship", or uses similar 14    words indicating that a party to the marriage, civil 15    union, or substantially similar legal relationship is the 16    parent of the child; or 17        (2) provides for support of the child by the parties 18    to the marriage, civil union, or substantially similar 19    legal relationship, unless parentage is specifically 20    disclaimed in the order.21    (d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this 22Section, a determination of parentage may be a defense in a 23subsequent proceeding seeking to adjudicate parentage by an 24individual who was not a party to the earlier proceeding. 25    (e) A party to an adjudication of parentage may challenge 26the adjudication only under the laws of this State relating to   HB2683- 47 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1appeal, vacation of judgments, or other judicial review. 2(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 3    (750 ILCS 46/622)4    Sec. 622. Allocation of parental responsibilities or 5parenting time prohibited to persons men who parent father 6through sexual assault or sexual abuse. 7    (a) This Section applies to a person who has been found to 8be the parent father of a child under this Act and who:9        (1) has been convicted of or who has pled guilty or 10    nolo contendere to a violation of Section 11-1.20 11    (criminal sexual assault), Section 11-1.30 (aggravated 12    criminal sexual assault), Section 11-1.40 (predatory 13    criminal sexual assault of a child), Section 11-1.50 14    (criminal sexual abuse), Section 11-1.60 (aggravated 15    criminal sexual abuse), Section 11-11 (sexual relations 16    within families), Section 12-13 (criminal sexual assault), 17    Section 12-14 (aggravated criminal sexual assault), 18    Section 12-14.1 (predatory criminal sexual assault of a 19    child), Section 12-15 (criminal sexual abuse), or Section 20    12-16 (aggravated criminal sexual abuse) of the Criminal 21    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or a similar 22    statute in another jurisdiction, for his conduct in 23    paragraph (1) of this subsection in parenting fathering 24    that child; or25        (2) at a fact-finding hearing, is found by clear and   HB2683- 48 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    convincing evidence to have committed an act of 2    non-consensual sexual penetration for his conduct in 3    fathering that child.4    (b) A person described in subsection (a) shall not be 5entitled to an allocation of any parental responsibilities or 6parenting time with that child without the consent of the 7parent who gave birth to the child or the child's mother or 8guardian. If the person described in subsection (a) is also 9the guardian of the child, the person he does not have the 10authority to consent to parenting time or the allocation of 11parental responsibilities under this Section. If the parent 12who gave birth to mother of the child is a minor, and the 13person described in subsection (a) is also the parent father 14or guardian of the parent who gave birth to the child mother, 15then the person he does not have the authority to consent to 16the allocation of parental responsibilities or parenting time.17    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, 18nothing in this Section shall be construed to relieve the 19parent father described in subsection (a) of any support and 20maintenance obligations to the child under this Act. The 21parent who gave birth to the child or the child's mother or 22guardian may decline support and maintenance obligations from 23the parent father.24    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the parent 25father described in subsection (a) of this Section is not 26entitled to any inheritance or other rights from the child   HB2683- 49 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1without the consent of the parent who gave birth to the child 2or the child's mother or guardian.3    (e) Notwithstanding any provision of the Illinois Marriage 4and Dissolution of Marriage Act, the parent, grandparent, 5great-grandparent, or sibling of the person described in 6subsection (a) of this Section does not have standing to bring 7an action requesting the allocation of parental 8responsibilities or parenting time with the child without the 9consent of the parent who gave birth to the child or the 10child's mother or guardian.11    (f) A petition under this Section may be filed by the 12parent who gave birth to the child or the child's mother or 13guardian either as an affirmative petition in circuit court or 14as an affirmative defense in any proceeding filed by the 15person described in subsection (a) of this Section regarding 16the child.17(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 18    (750 ILCS 46/702)19    Sec. 702. Parental status of donor. A Except as provided 20in this Act, a donor is not a parent of a child conceived by 21means of assisted reproduction.22(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.) 23    (750 ILCS 46/703)24    Sec. 703. Parentage of child of assisted reproduction.  HB2683- 50 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (a) An individual who consents under this Section to 2assisted reproduction with the intent to be a parent of a child 3conceived by assisted reproduction is a parent of the child 4Any individual who is an intended parent as defined by this Act 5is the legal parent of any resulting child. If the donor and 6the intended parent have been represented by independent 7counsel and entered into a written legal agreement in which 8the donor relinquishes all rights and responsibilities to any 9resulting child, the intended parent is the parent of the 10child. An agreement under this subsection shall be entered 11into prior to any insemination or embryo transfer.12    (b) The consent described in subsection (a) must be either 13of the following:14        (1) in a record signed before, on, or after the birth 15    of the child by the individual who gave birth to the child 16    and by an individual who intends to be a parent of the 17    child; an acknowledgment of parentage under Section 301 is 18    a record within the meaning of this subsection; or19        (2) in an agreement entered into before conception 20    that the individual who gave birth to the child and the 21    individual who intends to be a parent of the child 22    intended they both would be a parent of the child.23    Failure to consent as required by paragraph (1) or (2) of 24subsection (b) does not preclude a court from finding consent 25to parent if the individual for the first 2 years of the 26child's life, including any period of temporary absence,   HB2683- 51 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1resided in the same household with the child and openly held 2out the child as the individual's child If a person makes an 3anonymous gamete donation without a designated intended parent 4at the time of the gamete donation, the intended parent is the 5parent of any resulting child if the anonymous donor 6relinquished his or her parental rights in writing at the time 7of donation. The written relinquishment shall be directed to 8the entity to which the donor donated his or her gametes.9    (c) An individual who is an intended parent or the 10individual who gave birth to the child may bring a proceeding 11for a judgment of parentage before or after the birth of the 12child. If the court finds that the individual who did not give 13birth consented under subsection (b) of this Section, the 14court shall enter a judgment of parentage declaring the 15individual to be the parent seek a court order confirming the 16existence of a parent-child relationship prior to or after the 17birth of a child based on compliance with subsection (a) or (b) 18of this Section.19    (d) The individual who will give or who gave birth to the 20child or an individual who is or claims to be a parent under 21this Section may commence an action before or after the birth 22of a child to obtain a judgment to declare that the intended 23parent or parents are the parent or parents of the resulting 24child immediately on birth of the child and order that 25parental rights and responsibilities vest exclusively in the 26intended parent or parents immediately on birth of the child.   HB2683- 52 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1A judgment issued before the birth of the resulting child 2takes effect on the birth of the resulting child. The State, 3the Department, and the hospital where the child is or is 4expected to be born are not necessary parties to an action 5under this Section. If the requirements of subsection (a) of 6this Section are not met, or subsection (b) of this Section is 7found by a court to be inapplicable, a court of competent 8jurisdiction shall determine parentage based on evidence of 9the parties' intent at the time of donation.10(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.) 11    (750 ILCS 46/704)12    Sec. 704. Withdrawal of consent of intended parent or 13donor. 14    (a) An intended parent or donor may withdraw consent to 15assisted reproduction any time before an insemination or a 16transfer that results in a pregnancy to use his or her gametes 17in a writing or legal pleading with notice to the other 18participants and to any clinic or health care providers 19facilitating the assisted reproduction. Failure to give notice 20to the clinic or health care provider does not affect a 21determination of parentage under this Act. 22    (b) An intended parent who withdraws consent under this 23Section prior to the insemination or embryo transfer is not a 24parent of any resulting child. If a donor withdraws consent to 25his or her donation prior to the insemination or the   HB2683- 53 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1combination of gametes, the intended parent is not the parent 2of any resulting child. 3    If the intended parent or parents no longer wish to use any 4remaining cryopreserved fertilized ovum for medical purposes, 5the terms of the most recent informed consent of the intended 6parent or parents executed at the fertility center or a 7marital settlement agreement under a judgment of dissolution 8of marriage, judgment of legal separation, or judgment of 9dissolution of civil union governs the disposition of the 10fertilized ovum.11(Source: P.A. 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23.) 12    (750 ILCS 46/704.5 new)13    Sec. 704.5. Disposition. 14    (a) An intended parent may withdraw consent to use the 15parent's gametes in a writing or legal pleading with notice to 16the other participant, or clinic, if applicable, or gamete 17bank, if applicable, prior to insemination or in vitro 18fertilization.19    (b) If the intended parent or parents no longer agree on 20the use of any cryopreserved fertilized ovum for medical 21purposes, the terms of the most recent informed consent of the 22intended parent or parents executed at the fertility center or 23a marital settlement agreement under a judgment of dissolution 24of marriage, judgment of legal separation, or judgment of 25dissolution of civil union governs the disposition of the   HB2683- 54 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1cryopreserved fertilized ovum.  2    (750 ILCS 46/705)3    Sec. 705. Parental status of deceased individual. 4    (a) If an individual who intends to be a parent of a child 5conceived by assisted reproduction dies during the period 6between the transfer of a gamete or embryo and the birth of the 7child, the individual's death does not preclude the 8establishment of the individual's parentage of the child if 9the individual otherwise would be a parent of the child under 10this act.11    (b) If an individual who consented in a record to assisted 12reproduction by an individual who agreed to give birth to a 13child dies before a transfer of gametes or pre-embryos, the 14deceased individual is a parent of a child conceived by the 15assisted reproduction only if both of the following occurred: 16(i) Either the individual consented in a record that if 17assisted reproduction were to occur after the death of the 18individual, the individual would be a parent of the child or 19the individual's intent to be a parent of a child conceived by 20assisted reproduction after the individual's death is 21established by clear and convincing evidence; and (ii) the 22transfer of the gamete or pre-embryo transfer occurs not later 23than 36 months after the individual's death If an individual 24consents in a writing to be a parent of any child born of his 25or her gametes posthumously, and dies before the insemination   HB2683- 55 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1of the individual's gametes or embryo transfer, the deceased 2individual is a parent of any resulting child born within 36 3months of the death of the deceased individual.4(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.) 5    (750 ILCS 46/707)6    Sec. 707. Burden of proof. Unless otherwise specified in 7this Act, the burden of proof in an action under this Section 8is by a preponderance of the evidence Parentage established 9under Section 703, a withdrawal of consent under Section 704, 10or a proceeding to declare the non-existence of the 11parent-child relationship under Section 708 of this Act must 12be proven by clear and convincing evidence.13(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.) 14    (750 ILCS 46/708)15    Sec. 708. Limitation on proceedings to declare the 16non-existence of the parent-child relationship. An individual 17who, at the time of a child's birth, is the spouse of the birth 18parent cannot bring an action to declare the non-existence of 19the parent-child relationship under this Article shall be 20barred if brought more than 2 years following the birth of the 21child.22(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.) 23    (750 ILCS 46/709)  HB2683- 56 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    Sec. 709. Establishment of parentage; requirements of 2Gestational Surrogacy Act.3    (a) In the event of gestational surrogacy, in addition to 4the requirements of the Gestational Surrogacy Act, a 5parent-child relationship is established between a person and 6a child if all of the following conditions are met prior to the 7birth of the child:8        (1) The gestational surrogate certifies that the 9    surrogate she did not provide a gamete for the child, and 10    that the surrogate she is carrying the resulting child for 11    the intended parents.12        (2) The spouse, if any, of the gestational surrogate 13    certifies that the spouse he or she did not provide a 14    gamete for the child.15        (3) (Blank.) Each intended parent, or the parent's 16    legally authorized designee if an intended parent dies, 17    certifies that the child being carried by the gestational 18    surrogate was conceived using at least one of the intended 19    parents' gametes.20        (4) A physician licensed in the state in which the 21    fertilized ovum was inseminated or transferred to the 22    gestational surrogate certifies that the fetus child being 23    carried by the gestational surrogate was not conceived 24    with the gamete of the using the gamete or gametes of at 25    least one of the intended parents, and that neither the 26    gestational surrogate nor the gestational surrogate's   HB2683- 57 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    spouse, if any, provided gametes for the child being 2    carried by the gestational surrogate and the intended 3    parents meet the eligibility requirements as set forth in 4    the Gestational Surrogacy Act.5        (5) The attorneys for the intended parents and the 6    gestational surrogate each certify that the parties who 7    entered into a gestational surrogacy agreement complied 8    with intended to satisfy the requirements of the 9    Gestational Surrogacy Act.10    (b) All certifications under this Section shall be in 11writing and witnessed by 2 competent adults who are not the 12gestational surrogate, gestational surrogate's spouse, if any, 13or an intended parent. Certifications shall be on forms 14prescribed by the Illinois Department of Public Health and 15shall be executed prior to the birth of the child. All 16certifications shall be provided, prior to the birth of the 17child, to both the hospital where the gestational surrogate 18anticipates the delivery will occur and to the Illinois 19Department of Public Health.20    (c) Parentage established in accordance with this Section 21has the full force and effect of a judgment entered under this 22Act.23    (d) The Illinois Department of Public Health shall adopt 24rules to implement this Section. 25(Source: P.A. 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23.)   HB2683- 58 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (750 ILCS 46/710)2    Sec. 710. Applicability. This Article applies only to 3assisted reproductive arrangements or gestational surrogacy 4agreements contracts entered into after the effective date of 5this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly.6(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.) 7    Section 10. The Gestational Surrogacy Act is amended by 8changing Sections 5, 10, 15, 20, 25, 30, and 35 and by adding 9Sections 26, 27, 36, and 37 as follows: 10    (750 ILCS 47/5)11    Sec. 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to establish 12consistent standards and procedural safeguards for the 13protection of all parties involved in a gestational surrogacy 14agreement contract in this State and to confirm the legal 15status of children born as a result of these contracts. These 16standards and safeguards are meant to facilitate the use of 17this type of reproductive contract in accord with the public 18policy of this State.19(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.) 20    (750 ILCS 47/10)21    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:22    "Compensation" means payment of any valuable consideration 23for services in excess of reasonable medical and ancillary   HB2683- 59 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1costs.2    "Donor" means a person who provides gametes intended for 3use in assisted reproduction, whether or not for compensation. 4"Donor" does not include a person who is a parent under Article 57 or an intended parent under the Gestational Surrogacy Act an 6individual who contributes a gamete or gametes for the purpose 7of in vitro fertilization or implantation in another.8    "Gamete" means either a sperm or an egg.9    "Gestational surrogacy" means the process by which a 10person woman attempts to become pregnant carry and give birth 11to a child conceived created through in vitro fertilization 12using the gamete or gametes of at least one of the intended 13parents and to which the gestational surrogate has made no 14genetic contribution.15    "Gestational surrogate" means a person woman who agrees to 16engage in a gestational surrogacy.17    "Gestational surrogacy agreement contract" means a written 18agreement regarding gestational surrogacy.19    "Health care provider" means a person who is duly licensed 20to provide health care, including all medical, psychological, 21or counseling professionals.22    "Intended parent" means a person person or persons who 23consents to assisted reproduction, including enters into a 24gestational surrogacy agreement, such that the person is a 25legal contract with a gestational surrogate pursuant to which 26he or she will be the legal parent of the resulting child.   HB2683- 60 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1"Intended In the case of a married couple, any reference to an 2intended parent" includes, in the case of a married couple, 3shall include both spouses husband and wife for all purposes 4of this Act. This term shall include the intended mother, 5intended father, or both. 6    "In vitro fertilization" means all medical and laboratory 7procedures that are necessary to effectuate the extracorporeal 8fertilization of egg and sperm.9    "Medical evaluation" means an evaluation and consultation 10of a physician meeting the requirements of Section 60.11    "Mental health evaluation" means an evaluation and 12consultation of a mental health professional meeting the 13requirements of Section 60.14    "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine 15in all its branches in the state in which they practice 16Illinois.17    "Pre-embryo" means a fertilized egg prior to 14 days of 18development.19    "Pre-embryo transfer" means all medical and laboratory 20procedures that are necessary to effectuate the transfer of a 21pre-embryo into the uterine cavity.22(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.) 23    (750 ILCS 47/15)24    Sec. 15. Rights of Parentage. 25    (a) Except as provided in this Act, the person woman who   HB2683- 61 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1gives birth to a child is a parent presumed to be the mother of 2that child for purposes of State law.3    (b) In the case of a gestational surrogacy agreement that 4substantially complies with satisfying the requirements set 5forth in Sections 20 and 25 of this Act subsection (d) of this 6Section:7        (1) the intended parent or parents mother shall be 8    considered the parent or parents mother of the child for 9    all purposes of State law immediately upon the birth of 10    the child;11        (2) the intended father shall be the father of the 12    child for purposes of State law immediately upon the birth 13    of the child;14        (3) the child shall be considered the legitimate child 15    of the intended parent or parents for purposes of State 16    law immediately upon the birth of the child;17        (4) parental rights shall vest in the intended parent 18    or parents immediately upon the birth of the child;19        (5) sole custody of the child shall rest with the 20    intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth of 21    the child; and22        (2) (6) neither the gestational surrogate nor the 23    surrogate's spouse her husband, if any, shall be 24    considered the parents of the child for purposes of State 25    law immediately upon the birth of the child.26    (c) In the case of a gestational surrogacy agreement   HB2683- 62 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1meeting the requirements set forth in subsection (d) of this 2Section, in the event of a laboratory error in which the 3resulting child is not genetically related to either of the 4intended parents or a donor who donated to the intended parent 5or parents, the intended parents will be the parents of the 6child for all purposes of State law unless otherwise 7determined by a court of competent jurisdiction.8    (d) (Blank). The parties to a gestational surrogacy shall 9assume the rights and obligations of subsections (b) and (c) 10of this Section if:11        (1) the gestational surrogate satisfies the 12    eligibility requirements set forth in subsection (a) of 13    Section 20;14        (2) the intended parent or parents satisfy the 15    eligibility requirements set forth in subsection (b) of 16    Section 20; and17        (3) the gestational surrogacy occurs pursuant to a 18    gestational surrogacy contract meeting the requirements 19    set forth in Section 25.20(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.) 21    (750 ILCS 47/20)22    Sec. 20. Eligibility. 23    (a) A gestational surrogate shall be deemed to have 24satisfied the eligibility requirements of this Act if, she has 25met the following requirements at the time the gestational   HB2683- 63 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1surrogacy agreement contract is executed, the gestational 2surrogate:3        (1) she is at least 21 years of age;4        (2) she has given birth to at least one child;5        (3) she has completed a medical evaluation;6        (4) she has completed a mental health evaluation;7        (5) she has had and will have ongoing legal 8    representation by independent counsel, licensed in 9    Illinois and chosen by the surrogate, throughout the 10    course of the gestational surrogacy arrangement regarding 11    the terms undergone legal consultation with independent 12    legal counsel regarding the terms of the gestational 13    surrogacy contract and the potential legal consequences of 14    the gestational surrogacy agreement and the potential 15    consequences of the gestational surrogacy; and16        (6) she has obtained a health insurance policy that 17    covers major medical treatments and hospitalization and 18    the health insurance policy has a term that extends 19    throughout the duration of the expected pregnancy and for 20    8 weeks after the birth of the child; provided, however, 21    that the policy may be procured by the intended parents on 22    behalf of the gestational surrogate pursuant to the 23    gestational surrogacy agreement contract.24    (b) The intended parent or parents shall be deemed to have 25satisfied the eligibility requirements of this Act if, he, 26she, or they have met the following requirements at the time   HB2683- 64 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1the gestational surrogacy agreement contract is executed, the 2intended parent or parents:3        (1) is at least 21 years of age he, she, or they 4    contribute at least one of the gametes resulting in a 5    pre-embryo that the gestational surrogate will attempt to 6    carry to term;7        (2) are experiencing infertility as defined in Section 8    356mc of the Illinois Insurance Code he, she, or they have 9    a medical need for the gestational surrogacy as evidenced 10    by a qualified physician's affidavit attached to the 11    gestational surrogacy contract and as required by the 12    Illinois Parentage Act of 2015;13        (3) he, she, or they have completed a mental health 14    evaluation; and15        (4) has had and will have ongoing he, she, or they have 16    undergone legal representation by consultation with 17    independent legal counsel, licensed in Illinois, 18    throughout the course of the gestational surrogacy 19    arrangement regarding the terms of the gestational 20    surrogacy agreement contract and the potential legal 21    consequences of the gestational surrogacy.22(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.) 23    (750 ILCS 47/25)24    Sec. 25. Requirements for a gestational surrogacy 25agreement contract.   HB2683- 65 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (a) (Blank). A gestational surrogacy contract shall be 2presumed enforceable for purposes of State law only if:3        (1) it meets the contractual requirements set forth in 4    subsection (b) of this Section; and5        (2) it contains at a minimum each of the terms set 6    forth in subsection (c) of this Section.7    (b) A gestational surrogacy agreement contract shall meet 8the following requirements:9        (1) it shall be in writing;10        (2) it shall be executed prior to the commencement of 11    any medical procedures (other than medical or mental 12    health evaluations necessary to determine eligibility of 13    the parties pursuant to Section 20 of this Act) in 14    furtherance of the gestational surrogacy:15            (i) by a gestational surrogate meeting the 16        eligibility requirements of subsection (a) of Section 17        20 of this Act and, if married, the gestational 18        surrogate's spouse husband; and19            (ii) by the intended parent or parents meeting the 20        eligibility requirements of subsection (b) of Section 21        20 of this Act. In the event an intended parent is 22        married, both the intended parent and spouse husband 23        and wife must execute the gestational surrogacy 24        agreement contract;25        (3) each of the gestational surrogate and the intended 26    parent or parents shall have been represented by   HB2683- 66 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    independent legal counsel licensed in Illinois regarding 2    the terms of the gestational surrogacy agreement and the 3    potential legal consequences of the gestational surrogacy 4    separate counsel in all matters concerning the gestational 5    surrogacy and the gestational surrogacy contract;6        (3.5) it shall indicate each of the gestational 7    surrogate and the intended parent or parents shall have 8    signed a written acknowledgement that each party has he or 9    she received information about the legal, financial, and 10    contractual rights, expectations, penalties, and 11    obligations of the surrogacy agreement;12        (4) it shall require the intended parent or parents to 13    pay for independent legal representation for the 14    surrogate; 15        (5) if the gestational surrogacy agreement contract 16    provides for the payment of compensation to the 17    gestational surrogate, the compensation shall have been 18    placed in escrow with an independent escrow agent that is 19    independent of and is not affiliated with either the 20    intended parents' attorney or the gestational surrogate's 21    attorney prior to the gestational surrogate's commencement 22    of any medical procedure (other than medical or mental 23    health evaluations necessary to determine the gestational 24    surrogate's eligibility pursuant to subsection (a) of 25    Section 20 of this Act); and26        (6) (5) it shall be witnessed by 2 competent adults or   HB2683- 67 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    shall be notarized consistent with Illinois law.2    (b-5) A gestational surrogacy agreement may provide for 3the payment of compensation and reasonable expenses. 4    (c) A gestational surrogacy agreement contract shall 5provide for:6        (1) the express written agreement of the gestational 7    surrogate to:8            (i) undergo pre-embryo transfer and attempt to 9        become pregnant carry and give birth to the child; and10            (ii) surrender custody of the child to the 11        intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth 12        of the child;13        (2) if the gestational surrogate is married, the 14    express agreement of the gestational surrogate's spouse 15    her husband to:16            (i) undertake the obligations imposed on the 17        gestational surrogate pursuant to the terms of the 18        gestational surrogacy agreement contract;19            (ii) surrender custody of the child to the 20        intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth 21        of the child;22        (3) the right of the gestational surrogate to utilize 23    the services of a physician of the gestational surrogate's 24    her choosing, after consultation with the intended 25    parents, to provide the gestational surrogate with her 26    care during the pregnancy; and  HB2683- 68 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1        (4) the express written agreement of the intended 2    parent or parents to:3            (i) accept custody of the child immediately upon 4        the child's his or her birth; and5            (ii) assume sole responsibility for the support of 6        the child immediately upon the child's his or her 7        birth; .8        (iii) make all health and welfare decisions regarding 9    the surrogate and the pregnancy, except that this Act does 10    not enlarge or diminish the surrogate's right to terminate 11    their pregnancy, and any written or oral agreement 12    purporting to waive or limit these rights shall be void as 13    against public policy;14        (iv) disclose all of intended parent's financial 15    obligations with regard to the gestational surrogate, 16    including compensation and expenses; and 17        (v) include information about each party's right under 18    this Act to terminate the surrogacy agreement. 19    (d) (Blank). A gestational surrogacy contract shall be 20presumed enforceable for purposes of State law even though it 21contains one or more of the following provisions:22        (1) the gestational surrogate's agreement to undergo 23    all medical exams, treatments, and fetal monitoring 24    procedures that the physician recommended for the success 25    of the pregnancy;26        (2) the gestational surrogate's agreement to abstain   HB2683- 69 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    from any activities that the intended parent or parents or 2    the physician reasonably believes to be harmful to the 3    pregnancy and future health of the child, including, 4    without limitation, smoking, drinking alcohol, using 5    nonprescribed drugs, using prescription drugs not 6    authorized by a physician aware of the gestational 7    surrogate's pregnancy, exposure to radiation, or any other 8    activities proscribed by a health care provider;9        (3) the agreement of the intended parent or parents to 10    pay the gestational surrogate reasonable compensation; and11        (4) the agreement of the intended parent or parents to 12    pay for or reimburse the gestational surrogate for 13    reasonable expenses (including, without limitation, 14    medical, legal, or other professional expenses) related to 15    the gestational surrogacy and the gestational surrogacy 16    contract.17    (e) (Blank). In the event that any of the requirements of 18this Section are not met, a court of competent jurisdiction 19shall determine parentage based on evidence of the parties' 20intent.21(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.) 22    (750 ILCS 47/26 new)23    Sec. 26. Effect of subsequent change of marital status.24    (a) Unless a gestational surrogacy agreement expressly 25provides otherwise, both of the following apply:  HB2683- 70 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1        (1) The marriage of a surrogate after the surrogacy 2    agreement is signed by all parties does not affect the 3    validity of the agreement, the spouse's consent to the 4    agreement is not required, and the spouse is not a 5    presumed parent of a child conceived by assisted 6    reproduction under the agreement.7        (2) The dissolution, annulment, or declaration of 8    invalidity of the surrogate's marriage, the legal 9    separation of the surrogate, or a judgment of separate 10    maintenance concerning the surrogate after the surrogacy 11    contract is signed by all parties does not affect the 12    validity of the agreement.13        (3) Unless a surrogacy agreement expressly provides 14    otherwise, both of the following apply:15            (A) The marriage of an intended parent after the 16        surrogacy agreement is signed by all parties does not 17        affect the validity of a surrogacy agreement, the 18        consent of the spouse is not required, and the spouse 19        is not, based on the agreement, a parent of a child 20        conceived by assisted reproduction under the 21        agreement.22            (B) The dissolution, annulment, or declaration of 23        invalidity of an intended parent's marriage, the legal 24        separation of an intended parent, or a judgment of 25        separate maintenance concerning an intended parent 26        after the agreement is signed by all parties does not   HB2683- 71 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1        affect the validity of the agreement and, except as 2        otherwise provided in Section 36, the intended parent 3        is a parent of the child. 4    (750 ILCS 47/27 new)5    Sec. 27. Termination.6    (a) A party to a gestational surrogacy agreement may 7terminate the agreement at any time before an embryo transfer 8by giving notice of termination in a record to all other 9parties. If an embryo transfer does not result in a pregnancy, 10a party may terminate the agreement at any time before a 11subsequent embryo transfer.12    (b) Unless a gestational surrogacy agreement provides 13otherwise, on termination of the agreement under subsection 14(a), the parties are released from the agreement, except that 15each intended parent remains responsible for expenses that are 16contemplated under the agreement and incurred by the 17gestational surrogate through the date of termination of the 18surrogacy agreement or as otherwise agreed to in the 19gestational surrogacy agreement. 20    (c) Unless there is fraud, a party is not liable to any 21other party for a penalty or liquidated damages for 22terminating a gestational surrogacy agreement under this 23Section.  24    (750 ILCS 47/30)  HB2683- 72 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    Sec. 30. Duty to support. 2    (a) Any person who is a considered to be the parent of a 3child pursuant to Section 15 of this Act shall be obligated to 4support the child.5    (b) The breach of the gestational surrogacy agreement 6contract by the intended parent or parents shall not relieve 7such intended parent or parents of the support obligations 8imposed by this Act.9    (c) A gamete donor may be liable for child support only if 10he or she fails to enter into a legal agreement with the 11intended parent or parents in which the intended parent or 12parents agree to assume all rights and responsibilities for 13any resulting child, and the gamete donor relinquishes his or 14her rights to any gametes, resulting embryos, or children.15(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.) 16    (750 ILCS 47/35)17    Sec. 35. Establishment of parentage the parent-child 18relationship. 19    (a) In the event of gestational surrogacy, in addition to 20the requirements of the Articles 2 and 3 of the Illinois 21Parentage Act of 2015, a parent-child relationship is 22established by operation of law, upon birth of the child, 23between a person and a child if all of the following conditions 24are met:25        (1) The intended parent each certify compliance with   HB2683- 73 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    the eligibility requirements of Section 20.2        (2) The gestational surrogate certifies compliance 3    with the eligibility requirements of Section 20 and did 4    not provide a gamete for the child, and that the 5    gestational surrogate is carrying the resulting child for 6    the intended parents.7        (3) A physician licensed in the state in which the 8    pre-embryo was transferred to the gestational surrogate 9    certifies that the pre-embryo that was transferred to the 10    gestational surrogate was not formed with the gamete of 11    the gestational surrogate.12        (4) The attorneys for the intended parent or parents 13    and the gestational surrogate and spouse, if any, each 14    certify that the parties substantially satisfied the 15    requirements of Section 25 of this Act For purposes of the 16    Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, a parent-child 17    relationship shall be established prior to the birth of a 18    child born through gestational surrogacy if, in addition 19    to satisfying the requirements of Articles 2 and 3 of the 20    Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, the attorneys representing 21    both the gestational surrogate and the intended parent or 22    parents certify that the parties entered into a 23    gestational surrogacy contract intended to satisfy the 24    requirements of Section 25 of this Act with respect to the 25    child.26    (b) All certifications under this Section shall be in   HB2683- 74 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1writing and witnessed by 2 competent adults who are not the 2gestational surrogate, gestational surrogate's spouse, if any, 3or an intended parent. Certifications shall be on forms 4prescribed by the Illinois Department of Public Health and 5shall be executed before the birth of the child. All 6certifications shall be provided, before the birth of the 7child, to both the hospital where the gestational surrogate 8anticipates the delivery will occur and to the Illinois 9Department of Public Health The attorneys' certifications 10required by subsection (a) of this Section shall be filed on 11forms prescribed by the Illinois Department of Public Health 12and in a manner consistent with the requirement of the 13Illinois Parentage Act of 2015.14    (c) Parentage established in accordance with this Section 15has the full force and effect of a judgment entered under this 16Act.17    (d) The Illinois Department of Public Health shall adopt 18rules to implement this Section. 19(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 20    (750 ILCS 47/36 new)21    Sec. 36. Establishment of parentage with a substantially 22compliant agreement.23    (a) A gestational surrogacy agreement that substantially 24complies with this Act is enforceable.25    (b)(1) Before, on, or after the birth of a child conceived   HB2683- 75 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1by assisted reproduction under a gestational surrogacy 2agreement substantially compliant with this Act, a party to 3the agreement may commence an action in the circuit court for 4entry of a parentage judgment. The requested parentage 5judgment may be issued before or after the child's birth as 6requested by the parties. Either the gestational surrogate or 7the intended parent may bring the action. If the action is 8brought prior to all certifications required by Section 35 9being filed, all parties must receive notice of such action.10    (2) A petition shall include: (A) a copy of the executed 11gestational surrogacy agreement; (B) the certification of the 12assisted reproduction physician under Section 35; and (C) 13certifications from the attorneys representing the intended 14parent or parents and the gestational surrogate and spouse (if 15any) under Section 35. A petition supported by such 16certifications shall be sufficient to establish parentage and 17a hearing shall not be required unless the court requires 18additional information which cannot reasonably be ascertained 19without a hearing.20    (3) Upon a finding by a preponderance of the evidence that 21the petition satisfies paragraph (2) of subsection (b), a 22court shall no later than 30 days from the filing of the 23petition, issue a judgment of parentage.24    (4) The court shall issue a judgment:25        (A) declaring that each intended parent is a parent of 26    the child and ordering that parental rights and duties   HB2683- 76 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    vest immediately upon the birth of the child exclusively 2    in each intended parent;3        (B) declaring that the gestational surrogate and the 4    surrogate's spouse or former spouse, if any, are not the 5    parents of the child;6        (C) if necessary, ordering that the hospital where the 7    child will be or has been born, treat the intended parent 8    or parents as the sole legal parent or parents for all 9    purposes;10        (D) designating the content of the birth record and 11    directing the Department of Public Health to designate 12    each intended parent as a parent of the child, if such 13    record has not yet been established or needs to be 14    amended;15        (E) if necessary, ordering that the child be 16    surrendered to the intended parent or parents; and17        (F) for other relief the court determines proper.18    (5) To protect the privacy of the child and the parties, 19all records related to such action shall be impounded.20    (6) The Department of Public Health, the town or city 21clerk, and the hospital where the child is born or is intended 22to be born shall not be necessary parties to a proceeding.23    (7) Parentage judgments issued under this Section shall 24conclusively establish the parent-child relationship for all 25purposes.   HB2683- 77 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (750 ILCS 47/37 new)2    Sec. 37. Parentage and substantial noncompliance.3    (a) If a gestational surrogacy agreement does not 4substantially comply with the requirements of this Act:5        (1) The court shall determine the rights and duties of 6    the parties to the agreement consistent with the intent of 7    the parties at the time of execution, taking into account 8    the best interests of the child.9        (2) Each party to the surrogacy agreement and any 10    individual who at the time of the execution of the 11    agreement was a spouse of a party to the agreement has 12    standing to maintain an action to adjudicate an issue 13    related to the enforcement of the agreement. Any party to 14    the agreement not joining in the action shall be provided 15    with notice of the proceeding.  16    Section 20. The Gestational Surrogacy Act is amended by 17changing Sections 55, 60, 70, and 75 as follows: 18    (750 ILCS 47/55)19    Sec. 55. Damages. 20    (a) Except as expressly provided in the gestational 21surrogacy agreement or in subsection (b), if the agreement is 22breached by the gestational surrogate or one or more intended 23parents, the nonbreaching party is entitled to the remedies 24available at law or in equity contract, the intended parent or   HB2683- 78 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1parents shall be entitled to all remedies available at law or 2equity.3    (b) The breach of the gestational surrogacy agreement by 4one or more intended parents does not relieve the intended 5parent of the support obligations imposed by the parent and 6child relationship under this Act Except as expressly provided 7in the gestational surrogacy contract, the gestational 8surrogate shall be entitled to all remedies available at law 9or equity.10    (c) Specific performance is not a remedy available for 11breach by a gestational surrogate of provision in the 12agreement that the gestational surrogate be impregnated, 13terminate a pregnancy, or submit to medical procedures.14    (d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), if an 15intended parent is determined to be a parent of the child, 16specific performance is a remedy available for either of the 17following:18        (1) Breach of the gestational surrogacy agreement by a 19    gestational surrogate that prevents an intended parent 20    from exercising the full rights of parentage immediately 21    upon birth of the child.22        (2) Breach of the gestational surrogacy agreement by 23    an intended parent that prevents the intended parent's 24    acceptance of the duties of parentage immediately upon 25    birth of the child. 26(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.)   HB2683- 79 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (750 ILCS 47/60)2    Sec. 60. Rulemaking. The Department of Public Health may 3adopt rules pertaining to the required medical and mental 4health evaluations for a gestational surrogacy agreement 5contract. Until the Department of Public Health adopts such 6rules, medical and mental health evaluations and procedures 7shall be conducted in accordance with the recommended 8guidelines published by the American Society for Reproductive 9Medicine and the American College of Obstetricians and 10Gynecologists. The rules may adopt these guidelines or others 11by reference.12(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.) 13    (750 ILCS 47/70)14    Sec. 70. Irrevocability. No action to invalidate a 15gestational surrogacy meeting the requirements of subsection 16(d) of Section 20 and Section 25 15 of this Act or to challenge 17the rights of parentage established pursuant to the 18Gestational Surrogacy Act Section 15 of this Act and the 19Illinois Parentage Act of 2015 shall be commenced after 12 20months from the date of birth of the child.21(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.) 22    (750 ILCS 47/75)23    Sec. 75. Application. The provisions of this Act shall   HB2683- 80 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1apply only to gestational surrogacy agreements contracts 2entered into after the effective date of this Act.3(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.) 4    Section 25. The Adoption Act is amended by adding Section 525 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 50/25 new)7    Sec. 25. Confirmatory adoption for children born through 8assisted reproduction.9    (a) As used in this Section, the following words and terms 10shall have the following meanings unless the context shall 11clearly indicate another or different meaning or intent:12    "Assisted reproduction" means the definition provided in 13the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015.14    "Marriage" means and includes civil union and any legal 15relationship that provides substantially the same rights, 16benefits, and responsibilities as marriage and is recognized 17as valid in the state or jurisdiction in which it was entered.18    "Petitioner" means the person filing a petition for 19adoption in accordance with this Section.20    (b) Whenever a child is born as a result of assisted 21reproduction and the person who did not give birth is a parent 22under the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015 and seeks to file a 23petition to confirm parentage through an adoption of the 24child, the court shall permit the parent to file a petition for   HB2683- 81 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1adoption in accordance with this Section.2    (c) A complete petition shall be comprised of the 3following:4        (1) the petition for adoption signed by each 5    petitioner;6        (2) a copy of the petitioners' marriage certificate, 7    if petitioners are married;8        (3) a declaration by the person giving birth and the 9    person who did not give birth explaining the circumstances 10    of the child's birth through assisted reproduction, 11    attesting to their consent to assisted reproduction, and 12    attesting that no competing claims of parentage exist; and13        (4) a copy of the child's birth certificate.14    (d) A complete petition for adoption, as described in 15subsection (c) of this Section, shall serve as the 16petitioners' written consents to adoption, and no additional 17consent or notice shall be required. The petition shall be 18verified by the petitioners.19    (e) If the petitioners conceived through assisted 20reproduction with donor gamete or donor embryo under Article 7 21of the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, the court shall not 22require notice of the adoption to the donor.23    (f) Unless otherwise ordered by the court for good cause 24shown and supported by written findings, for purposes of 25evaluating and granting a petition for adoption under this 26Section, the court may not require any of the following:  HB2683- 82 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1        (1) an in-person hearing or appearance;2        (2) an investigation or home study by, notice to, or 3    approval of the Department of Children and Family 4    Services;5        (3) appointment of a guardian ad litem;6        (4) a criminal background check; or7        (5) a minimum residency period in the home of the 8    petitioners.9    (g) The court shall grant the adoption under this Section 10and issue a decree of adoption within 30 days or as soon as is 11possible after the petition has been filed if it finds:12        (1) the child was born through assisted reproduction;13        (2) each intended parent consented to the assisted 14    reproduction as evidenced by the parent's signature to the 15    petition; and16        (3) there are no competing claims of parentage.17    (h) A petition to adopt pursuant to this Section, when a 18petitioner's parentage is presumed or legally recognized under 19Illinois law, must not be denied on the basis that the 20petitioner's parentage is already presumed or legally 21recognized.22    (i) Effect on other laws. When parentage is presumed or 23legally recognized under Illinois law, it may not be 24considered as evidence of parentage or evidence of the best 25interests of the child in any manner that the parties did not 26petition for adoption under this Section.  HB2683- 83 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    (j) For purposes of a confirmatory adoption, jurisdiction 2and venue shall be governed by Section 603 of the Illinois 3Parentage Act of 2015.4    (k) The confidentiality provisions in Section 18 apply to 5this Section.  6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.  HB2683- 84 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    750 ILCS 46/1024    750 ILCS 46/1035    750 ILCS 46/1056    750 ILCS 46/1077    750 ILCS 46/2018    750 ILCS 46/2049    750 ILCS 46/20510    750 ILCS 46/20611    750 ILCS 46/30112    750 ILCS 46/30213    750 ILCS 46/30314    750 ILCS 46/30515    750 ILCS 46/40116    750 ILCS 46/40217    750 ILCS 46/40318    750 ILCS 46/40419    750 ILCS 46/40520    750 ILCS 46/40721    750 ILCS 46/40822    750 ILCS 46/50123    750 ILCS 46/50224    750 ILCS 46/60125    750 ILCS 46/602  HB2683- 85 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    750 ILCS 46/6032    750 ILCS 46/6043    750 ILCS 46/6054    750 ILCS 46/6065    750 ILCS 46/6086    750 ILCS 46/6097    750 ILCS 46/6108    750 ILCS 46/6129    750 ILCS 46/61410    750 ILCS 46/61511    750 ILCS 46/61712    750 ILCS 46/62113    750 ILCS 46/62214    750 ILCS 46/70215    750 ILCS 46/70316    750 ILCS 46/70417    750 ILCS 46/704.5 new18    750 ILCS 46/70519    750 ILCS 46/70720    750 ILCS 46/70821    750 ILCS 46/70922    750 ILCS 46/71023    750 ILCS 47/524    750 ILCS 47/1025    750 ILCS 47/1526    750 ILCS 47/20  HB2683- 86 -LRB104 07510 JRC 17554 b1    750 ILCS 47/252    750 ILCS 47/26 new3    750 ILCS 47/27 new4    750 ILCS 47/305    750 ILCS 47/356    750 ILCS 47/36 new7    750 ILCS 47/37 new8    750 ILCS 47/559    750 ILCS 47/6010    750 ILCS 47/7011    750 ILCS 47/7512    750 ILCS 50/25 new